North Carolina statutes. Chapter 72. Inns, Hotels and Restaurants.
Article 6. Advertisements by Motor Courts, Tourist Camps, etc.

§ 72-50.
Rate advertisements to contain additional data.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, who owns, operates or who has control of the operation of any motor court, tourist court, tourist camp, or guest house to publish or cause to be displayed in writing, or by any other means, any advertisement which includes a statement relating to the rates or charges obtaining at such motor court, tourist court, tourist camp, or guest house, unless such advertisement shall, with equal prominence, contain additional data relating to such room rates, in the following particulars:

Whether the rate advertised is for a single or multiple occupancy of the room;

The number of rooms or units in each price level where such advertisement indicates varying rates; and

The dates or period of time during which such advertised rates are available.

History.

1955, c. 1200, s. 1.

§ 72-51.
Violation a misdemeanor.

Any person, firm, or corporation, violating the provisions of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1955, c. 1200, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 551; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 72-52.
Article declared supplemental.

This Article is declared to be supplemental in nature and shall not be construed to repeal any existing law relating to the operation of any motor court, tourist court, tourist camp, or guest house.

History.

1955, c. 1200, s. 3.